Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-273
Building housing for individuals with disabilities; authority; duties; collaboration required.

(1) For purposes of this section, Olmstead Plan means the comprehensive strategic plan for providing services to individuals with disabilities that was developed in accordance with section 81-6,122.

(2) In order to help fulfill one of the goals of the Olmstead Plan, the authority shall use its best efforts to obtain state and federal grants for the purpose of building safe, affordable, and accessible housing for individuals with disabilities.

(3) The authority shall collaborate with the Department of Economic Development and the Department of Health and Human Services in obtaining such grants.

Laws 2023, LB92, § 74.